Tennessee, session 114, SB0173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-411, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) The department of transportation shall submit a brief written summary to the
committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over transportation matters
and the transportation and safety committee of the senate no later than March 15, 2026,
and March 15 of each subsequent year, concerning placards issued to transporters of
manufactured homes pursuant to this section, including data on unsafe and erratic
driving reported to the department using the telephone number that appears on the
placards.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0173
000949
- 1 -